Vermont, session 2025-2026, H871.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 1347 is amended to read:
§ 1347. NONDISCLOSURE OR MISREPRESENTATION;
OVERPAYMENTS; WAIVER
(a)(1) Any person who fails, without good cause, to make reasonable
efforts to secure suitable work when directed to do so by the employment
office or the Commissioner and has received any amount as benefits under this
chapter with respect to weeks for which the person is determined to be
ineligible because of the failure, and any person who by nondisclosure or
misrepresentation by the person, or by another, of a material fact (irrespective
of whether the nondisclosure or misrepresentation was known or fraudulent)
has received any amount as benefits under this chapter while any conditions
for the receipt of benefits imposed by this chapter were not fulfilled in the
person’s case or while the person was disqualified from receiving benefits,
shall be liable for the amount.
(2) A person shall be deemed to have failed to make reasonable efforts
to secure suitable work if the person:
(A) fails, without good cause, to conduct an interview for suitable
work after an employer has contacted the person to arrange such an interview;
or
VT LEG #386252 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.871
2026 Page 3 of 4
(B) provides false or inaccurate information to an employer that
prevents the employer from contacting the person to arrange an interview for
suitable work.
(3) Notice of determination in such cases shall specify that the person is
liable to repay to the Fund the amount of overpaid benefits, the basis of the
overpayment, and the week or weeks for which the benefits were paid. The
determination shall be made within three years after the date of the
overpayment.
* * *
Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. § 1368 is amended to read:
§ 1368. FALSE STATEMENTS TO INCREASE PAYMENTS
(a) A person shall not who intentionally make makes a false statement or
representation to obtain or, increase, or initiate any benefit or other payment
under this chapter, either for the employee whether for themselves or any other
person, shall, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, be:
(1) liable to repay the amount of the overpaid benefits and any
applicable penalty imposed pursuant to section 1347 of this chapter;
(2) assessed a further administrative penalty of up to $5,000.00; and
(3) ineligible to receive benefits pursuant to this chapter for a period of
up to five years from the date on which the false statement or representation
was discovered.
VT LEG #386252 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.871
2026 Page 4 of 4
(b) Interested parties shall have the right to appeal from any determination
under this section and the same procedure shall be followed as provided for in
subsection 1348(a) and section 1349 of this chapter.
(c) The Commissioner may collect an unpaid administrative penalty by
filing a civil action in the Superior Court.
Sec. 3. 21 V.S.A. § 1314b is added to read:
§ 1314b. DATA CROSS-CHECKS
To aid in the reduction and prevention of unemployment insurance fraud,
the Commissioner shall conduct data cross-checks at least quarterly using the
following resources:
(1) the National Association of State Workforce Agencies’ Integrity
Data Hub;
(2) the National Directory of New Hires and the State Directory of New
Hires;
(3) the Vermont Department of Corrections’ incarceration records; and
(4) the Vermont Department of Health’s vital statistics system.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386252 v.1